dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- वेला; वेला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वेला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एक्कासि; एक्कासि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एक्कासि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिनाकाम; बिनाकाम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिनाकाम__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वभावतया; स्वभावतया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वभावतया__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- युरोपस्थित; युरोपस्थित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="युरोपस्थित__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाहिनेभन्दा; चाहिनेभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाहिनेभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नगीचै; नगीचै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नगीचै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छ्याँ; छ्याँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छ्याँ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- परेजस्तो; परेजस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="परेजस्तो__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछिल्तिर; पछिल्तिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछिल्तिर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दहीभन्दा; दहीभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दहीभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सालयता; सालयता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सालयता__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिरिङ्ग; सिरिङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिरिङ्ग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामने; सामने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामने__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धुमधाम; धुमधाम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धुमधाम__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उँधो; उँधो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उँधो__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खिसिक्क; खिसिक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खिसिक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यहिं; त्यहिं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यहिं__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्वाप्य; क्वाप्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्वाप्य__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्राय; प्राय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्राय__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुल्लमखुला; खुल्लमखुला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खुल्लमखुला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आफसेआफ; आफसेआफ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आफसेआफ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुईपल्ट; दुईपल्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुईपल्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उतिसारो; उतिसारो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उतिसारो__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सजिलैसित; सजिलैसित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सजिलैसित__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मनलेभन्दा; मनलेभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मनलेभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आदिकाल; आदिकाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आदिकाल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यता; त्यता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यता__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यता; त्यता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यता__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दुबैपल्ट; दुबैपल्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दुबैपल्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाम्रोभन्दा; हाम्रोभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हाम्रोभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फ्याङ्गै; फ्याङ्गै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फ्याङ्गै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धान्नै; धान्नै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धान्नै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामू; सामू; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामू__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामु; सामु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामु__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झर्लाजस्तो; झर्लाजस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झर्लाजस्तो__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोलीपल्ट; भोलीपल्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भोलीपल्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सप्रमाण; सप्रमाण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सप्रमाण__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मनमन; मनमन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मनमन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आत्मीयतापूर्वक; आत्मीयतापूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आत्मीयतापूर्वक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अच्चानक; अच्चानक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अच्चानक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घरभन्दा; घरभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घरभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निस्फिक्री; निस्फिक्री; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निस्फिक्री__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टवालटवाल्ती; टवालटवाल्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टवालटवाल्ती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="वेला"><i>वेला</i><par n="वेला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एक्कासि"><i>एक्कासि</i><par n="एक्कासि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बिनाकाम"><i>बिनाकाम</i><par n="बिनाकाम__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वभावतया"><i>स्वभावतया</i><par n="स्वभावतया__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="युरोपस्थित"><i>युरोपस्थित</i><par n="युरोपस्थित__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहिनेभन्दा"><i>चाहिनेभन्दा</i><par n="चाहिनेभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नगीचै"><i>नगीचै</i><par n="नगीचै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छ्याँ"><i>छ्याँ</i><par n="छ्याँ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="परेजस्तो"><i>परेजस्तो</i><par n="परेजस्तो__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पछिल्तिर"><i>पछिल्तिर</i><par n="पछिल्तिर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दहीभन्दा"><i>दहीभन्दा</i><par n="दहीभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सालयता"><i>सालयता</i><par n="सालयता__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सिरिङ्ग"><i>सिरिङ्ग</i><par n="सिरिङ्ग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सामने"><i>सामने</i><par n="सामने__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="धुमधाम"><i>धुमधाम</i><par n="धुमधाम__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उँधो"><i>उँधो</i><par n="उँधो__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खिसिक्क"><i>खिसिक्क</i><par n="खिसिक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यहिं"><i>त्यहिं</i><par n="त्यहिं__"/></e>
    <e lm="क्वाप्य"><i>क्वाप्य</i><par n="क्वाप्य__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राय"><i>प्राय</i><par n="प्राय__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खुल्लमखुला"><i>खुल्लमखुला</i><par n="खुल्लमखुला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आफसेआफ"><i>आफसेआफ</i><par n="आफसेआफ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दुईपल्ट"><i>दुईपल्ट</i><par n="दुईपल्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उतिसारो"><i>उतिसारो</i><par n="उतिसारो__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सजिलैसित"><i>सजिलैसित</i><par n="सजिलैसित__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मनलेभन्दा"><i>मनलेभन्दा</i><par n="मनलेभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आदिकाल"><i>आदिकाल</i><par n="आदिकाल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यता"><i>त्यता</i><par n="त्यता__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यता"><i>त्यता</i><par n="त्यता__"/></e>
    <e lm="दुबैपल्ट"><i>दुबैपल्ट</i><par n="दुबैपल्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हाम्रोभन्दा"><i>हाम्रोभन्दा</i><par n="हाम्रोभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फ्याङ्गै"><i>फ्याङ्गै</i><par n="फ्याङ्गै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="धान्नै"><i>धान्नै</i><par n="धान्नै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सामू"><i>सामू</i><par n="सामू__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सामु"><i>सामु</i><par n="सामु__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="झर्लाजस्तो"><i>झर्लाजस्तो</i><par n="झर्लाजस्तो__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भोलीपल्ट"><i>भोलीपल्ट</i><par n="भोलीपल्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सप्रमाण"><i>सप्रमाण</i><par n="सप्रमाण__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मनमन"><i>मनमन</i><par n="मनमन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आत्मीयतापूर्वक"><i>आत्मीयतापूर्वक</i><par n="आत्मीयतापूर्वक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अच्चानक"><i>अच्चानक</i><par n="अच्चानक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="घरभन्दा"><i>घरभन्दा</i><par n="घरभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="निस्फिक्री"><i>निस्फिक्री</i><par n="निस्फिक्री__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="टवालटवाल्ती"><i>टवालटवाल्ती</i><par n="टवालटवाल्ती__adv"/></e>
